New York, session 2025-2026, S1928.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Employees appointed by the sheriff of Seneca county, pursuant to 4 their special duties serving as uniformed marine patrol officers; 5 provided, however, that nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to 6 authorize such officer to carry, possess, repair or dispose of a firearm 7 unless the appropriate license has been issued pursuant to section 8 400.00 of the penal law or to authorize such officer to carry or possess 9 a firearm except while on duty. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04903-01-5